Missouri, session 2026, HB2451.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 575.080, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 575.080, to read as follows:
575.080. 1. A person commits the offense of making a false report if he or she
knowingly:
(1) Gives false information to any person for the purpose of implicating another
person in an offense; [or]
(2) Makes a false report to a law enforcement officer that an offense has occurred or
is about to occur; [or]
(3) Makes a false report or causes a false report to be made to a law enforcement
officer, security officer, fire department or other organization, official or volunteer, which
deals with emergencies involving danger to life or property that a fire or other incident calling
for an emergency response has occurred or is about to occur; or
(4) Makes a false report or causes a false report to be made to a law enforcement
officer or federal special investigator, an employee of a law enforcement agency, a
correctional officer or jailer, an electronic portal, or a telephone hotline service that
another person is in the United States illegally and the person knows that the
information provided in the report is false or has no proof that the information is true.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2451 2
2. It is a defense to a prosecution under subsection 1 of this section that the person
retracted the false statement or report before the law enforcement officer or any other person
took substantial action in reliance thereon.
3. The defendant shall have the burden of injecting the issue of retraction under
subsection 2 of this section.
4. The offense of making a false report is a class B misdemeanor.
✔